Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.63.020

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Institutions of higher education" or "institutions" mean those institutions as defined in RCW 28B.10.016(4).

(2) "Commercial activity" means an activity which provides a product or service for a fee which could be obtained from a commercial source.

(3) "Fees" means any fees or charges imposed for goods, services, or facilities.

[ 1987 c 97 s 2.]